apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="cut__vblex__sep">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ting</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="br/ing__vblex__sep">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ings</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ought</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inging</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inging</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>inging</l>        <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ben/d__vblex__sep">
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ds</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>t</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>t</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ding</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ding</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ding</l>        <r>d<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="appl/y__vblex__sep">
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ies</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ied</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ied</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="accept__vblex__sep">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="persons">      <!-- Ásta Árnadóttir, Ásta Á. Árnadóttir -->
      <e><re>[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+ ([A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+|[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ])?.? ?[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+dóttir</re><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
      <!-- Davíð Oddsson, Davíð D. Oddsson -->
      <e><re>[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+ ([A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+|[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ])?.? ?[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+sson</re><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
      <e><re>[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+ ([A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+|[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ])?.? ?[A-ZÁÞÐÉÍÓÚÝÖÅ][a-záðéíóúýöå]+sen</re><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="pull away"><i>pull</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="put down"><i>put</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="set on fire"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>on<b/>fire</l><r><g><b/>on<b/>fire</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pull over"><i>pull</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>over</l><r><g><b/>over</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bring down"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex__sep"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bring together"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>together</l><r><g><b/>together</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="carry out"><i>carr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="check out"><i>check</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pick up"><i>pick</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pull out"><i>pull</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="send back"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="set up"><i>set</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="shut down"><i>shut</i><par n="cut__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="slow down"><i>slow</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="turn off"><i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
    <e><par n="persons"/></e>
